Idaho, session 2026, S1431.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Water Resources the fol-
lowing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the General Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL BENEFIT
COSTS PAYMENTS TOTAL
Planning and Technical Services $195,000 $195,000
Northern Idaho Adjudication $97,500 97,500
Bear River Basin Adjudication 97,500 0 97,500
TOTAL $195,000 $195,000 $390,000
SECTION 2. CASH TRANSFER FOR AQUIFER MONITORING. There is hereby appro-
priated to the Department of Water Resources and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $716,000 from the Revolving Development Fund to the
Aquifer Planning and Management Fund on July 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter
as practicable for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, to be used
for aquifer monitoring, measurement, and modeling.
SECTION 3. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE ARPA STATE FISCAL RE-
COVERY FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Water
Resources any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappro-
priated to the Department of Water Resources in the Planning and Technical
Services Program from the ARPA State Fiscal Recovery Fund for fiscal year
2026 to be used for nonrecurring expenditures related to water infrastruc-
ture projects for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office
of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund,


expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to
processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 4. FILING FEES. Notwithstanding Section 42-1414(1)(c), Idaho
Code, it is the intent of the Legislature that moneys appropriated in Sec-
tion 1 of this act for Idaho's general stream adjudications from the General
Fund count toward the filing fees required under Section 42-1414(1)(a) and
(b), Idaho Code, for water right claims filed in Idaho's general stream ad-
judications by the Idaho Water Resource Board and the Governor of the State
of Idaho based on instream flow, public lake level maintenance, or recre-
ation. If the General Fund appropriation exceeds the amount required for the
Idaho Water Resource Board's and the Governor's filing fees in the current
fiscal year, the excess shall be counted toward future filing fees required
for those same purposes. If the General Fund appropriation does not meet or
exceed the fee required for claims of the Idaho Water Resource Board or the
Governor, the Director of the Department of Water Resources shall grant an
extension of time to the Idaho Water Resource Board or the Governor to file
the claim, and the General Fund appropriation for the following fiscal year
shall be counted toward the balance of the filing fee.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.